Massachusetts, session 194th, H621.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1B of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the sixth paragraph, the following three paragraphs:
The board shall create state policies and procedures to ensure appropriate education of
advanced and gifted students in all grades K-12.
The board shall survey schools and districts on an annual basis to report the following:
(a) The policies and procedures they have in place to identify and educate their
advanced, gifted and talented students
(b) the number of advanced and gifted students, disaggregated by race/ethnicity and
low-income, identified and served at each of the K-12 grade levels
The board shall compile and publish the information received regarding (a) and (b) in an
annual compiled report, and as part of the school and district profiles on the department website.
of 2

The board shall ensure that district programming for advanced students is based on best
practices identified within the field of gifted education, and that gifted, talented and advanced
students of all ages receive effective challenges within their zones of proximal development
throughout the ordinary school day. The Board shall publish an annual report describing how the
state and districts are developing structural capacity to provide gifted, talented and advanced
students the opportunity to reach their full potential to fulfill, for them, the intent stated in section
1 of this chapter.
of 2